Wyoming, session 2026, HB0007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 42-2-115 is created to read:

42-2-115. Supplemental nutrition assistance program;
waiver; definitions.

(a) As used in this section, "accessory food" means
one (1) or more of the following:

HB0007

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0140
(i) A food item that is generally considered a
snack food or dessert, including but not limited to potato
chips, ice cream, crackers, cupcakes, cookies, popcorn,
pastries and candy;

(ii) A food item that complements or supplements
meals, including but not limited to coffee, tea, cocoa,
carbonated and uncarbonated drinks, condiments, spices,
salt and sugar;

(iii) A food item containing an accessory food
item under paragraphs (i) or (ii) of this subsection as its
main ingredient.

(b) Not later than July 1, 2026, the director of the
department of family services shall request a waiver from
the United States department of agriculture to exclude
accessory foods from the definition of eligible foods under
7 C.F.R. § 271.2. If the waiver is granted, the director of
the department of family services shall prohibit the
acquisition of accessory foods through benefits provided
under the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program. If no waiver is granted, the director of the
HB0007

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0140
department of family services shall repeat the request for
a waiver not later than July 1 of each year thereafter
until the waiver is granted.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0007